Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-704
Costs not reimbursable.

The costs of routine medical services provided in the ordinary course of the duties of regular staff of a jail, prison, or other similar holding or detention facility shall not be considered reimbursable under sections 47-701 to 47-705.

Laws 1999, LB 112, § 4.